Idaho statutes. Title 58 PUBLIC LANDS
Chapter 10
TIMBER SUPPLY STABILIZATION

Sec.

§ 58-1001. Short title. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2010, ch. 60, § 1, effective July 1, 2010.

§ 58-1002. Legislative findings and purposes. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2010, ch. 60, § 1, effective July 1, 2010.

§ 58-1003. Definitions. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2010, ch. 60, § 1, effective July 1, 2010.

§ 58-1004. Sale of state timber. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2010, ch. 60, § 1, effective July 1, 2010.

§ 58-1005. Certification and approval of bidders prior to bidding. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2010, ch. 60, § 1, effective July 1, 2010.

§ 58-1006. Removal from list of certified bidders. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2010, ch. 60, § 1, effective July 1, 2010.

§ 58-1007. Implementation of this chapter. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2010, ch. 60, § 1, effective July 1, 2010.

§ 58-1008. Severability. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2010, ch. 60, § 1, effective July 1, 2010.